Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1662.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 13-901, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-901. Probation A. If a person who has been convicted of an offense is eligible for probation, the court may suspend the imposition or execution of sentence and, if so, shall without delay place the person on intensive probation supervision pursuant to section 13-913 or supervised or unsupervised probation on such terms and conditions as the law requires and the court deems appropriate, including participation in any programs authorized in title 12, chapter 2, article 11. If a person is not eligible for probation, imposition or execution of sentence shall not be suspended or delayed.  If the court imposes probation, it may also impose a fine as authorized by chapter 8 of this title. If probation is granted the court shall impose a condition that the person waive extradition for any probation revocation procedures and it shall order restitution pursuant to section 13-603, subsection C where there is a victim who has suffered economic loss. B. If probation is granted, the following apply to any conditions of probation imposed unless otherwise required by law: 1. In determining the defendant's conditions of probation, the court or a probation officer shall impose only conditions of PROBATION that are reasonably necessary, individually determined and narrowly tailored to: (a) Assist the defendant in leading a law-abiding life. (b) Protect public safety. (c) Promote the defendant's rehabilitation. 2. The conditions of probation that are imposed shall be informed by the defendant's criminogenic risk and needs as established by a validated risk assessment tool. 3. The court or The probation officer shall: (a) Before imposing a standard condition of probation, consider waiving any standard condition of probation that is not reasonably necessary to achieve the purposes prescribed in paragraph 1 of this subsection. (b) Before imposing a special condition of probation, consider all INFORMATION that is properly presented to the court Before imposing a special condition of probation, shall determine if the condition is more restrictive than is reasonably necessary to achieve the purposes prescribed in paragraph 1 of this subsection and Shall not impose a special condition of probation unless the special condition is supported by the record. 4. If a presentence report was prepared pursuant to section 13-701, the conditions of probation imposed shall be informed by the findings of that presentence report. C. When granting probation to an adult the court, as a condition of probation, shall assess a monthly fee of not less than $65 unless, after determining the inability of the probationer to pay the fee, the court assesses a lesser fee. This fee is not subject to any surcharge. In justice and municipal courts the fee shall only be assessed when the person is placed on supervised probation.  For persons placed on probation in the superior court, the fee shall be paid to the clerk of the superior court and the clerk of the court shall pay all monies collected from this fee to the county treasurer for deposit in the adult probation services fund established by section 12-267. For persons placed on supervised probation in the justice court, the fee shall be paid to the justice court and the justice court shall transmit all of the monies to the county treasurer for deposit in the adult probation services fund established by section 12-267. For persons placed on supervised probation in the municipal court, the fee shall be paid to the municipal court. The municipal court shall transmit all of the monies to the city treasurer who shall transmit the monies to the county treasurer for deposit in the adult probation services fund established by section 12-267. Any amount assessed pursuant to this subsection shall be used to supplement monies used for the salaries of adult probation and surveillance officers and for support of programs and services of the superior court adult probation departments. B. D. The period of probation shall be determined according to section 13-902, except that if a person is released pursuant to section 31-233, subsection B and community supervision is waived pursuant to section 13-603, subsection K, the court shall extend the period of probation by the amount of time the director of the state department of corrections approves for the inmate's temporary release. C. E. The court, in its discretion, may issue a warrant for the rearrest of the defendant and may modify or add to the conditions or, if the defendant commits an additional offense or violates a condition, may revoke probation in accordance with the Arizona rules of criminal procedure at any time before the expiration or termination of the period of probation. If the court revokes the defendant's probation and the defendant is serving more than one probationary term concurrently, the court may sentence the person to terms of imprisonment to be served consecutively. D. F. At any time during the probationary term of the person released on probation, any probation officer, without warrant or other process and at any time until the final disposition of the case, may rearrest any person and bring the person before the court. E. G. The court, on its own initiative or on application of the probationer, after notice and an opportunity to be heard for the prosecuting attorney and, on request, the victim, may terminate the period of probation or intensive probation and discharge the defendant at a time earlier than that originally imposed if in the court's opinion the ends of justice will be served and if the conduct of the defendant on probation warrants it. F. H. When granting probation the court may require that the defendant be imprisoned in the county jail at whatever time or intervals, consecutive or nonconsecutive, the court shall determine, within the period of probation, as long as the period actually spent in confinement does not exceed one year or the maximum period of imprisonment allowed under chapter 7 of this title, whichever is the shorter. G. I. If the defendant is placed on lifetime probation and has served one year in the county jail as a term of probation, the court may require that the defendant be additionally imprisoned in the county jail at whatever time or intervals, consecutive or nonconsecutive, the court shall determine, within the period of probation if the defendant's probation is revoked by the court and the defendant is subsequently reinstated on probation. The period actually spent in confinement as a term of being reinstated on probation shall not exceed one year or, when including the initial one-year period of incarceration imposed as a term of probation, the maximum period of imprisonment allowed under chapter 7 of this title, whichever is shorter. H. J. If restitution is made a condition of probation, the court shall fix the amount of restitution and the manner of performance pursuant to chapter 8 of this title. I. K. When granting probation, the court shall set forth at the time of sentencing and on the record the factual and legal reasons in support of each sentence. J. L. If the defendant meets the criteria set forth in section 13-901.01 or 13-3422, the court may place the defendant on probation pursuant to either section. If a defendant is placed on probation pursuant to section 13-901.01 or 13-3422, the court may impose any term of probation that is authorized pursuant to this section and that is not in violation of section 13-901.01. K. M. If the court imposes a term of probation, the court may require the defendant to report to a probation officer. The court or the defendant's probation officer may allow the defendant to fulfill a reporting requirement through remote reporting. The probation officer shall take into consideration and make accommodations for the probationer's work schedule, family caregiver obligations, substance abuse treatment or recovery program, mental health treatment, transportation availability and medical care requirements before setting the reporting time and location requirements for the probationer. L. N. If a probationer makes a written request to the supervising probation department to courtesy transfer the probationer's intensive probation supervision or supervised probation to another county in this state with the intent to reside in that county and provides proof of family caregiver obligations, employment or housing, or an offer of employment or housing that will assist in the probationer's positive behavioral change, the supervising probation department shall do all of the following: 1. Confirm the details of the probationer's employment, housing or family caregiving plans. 2. Review any victim safety concerns and ensure compliance with the victims' bill of rights. 3. Submit the request for permission to proceed to the receiving county within seven business days after receipt. M. O. After verifying the information submitted by the sending probation department pursuant to subsection L  n of this section, the receiving probation department shall provide the sending probation department with permission for the probationer to proceed to the receiving county within seven business days after receipt unless the receiving probation department finds the basis for the plan is not factual or the transfer will endanger the victim. N. P. If a probationer's intensive probation supervision or supervised probation is courtesy transferred to another county pursuant to subsection L  n of this section and the probationer subsequently violates the terms of the probationer's probation or commits an additional offense while on probation, the probation department in the county in which the probation violation or additional offense occurred may not return the probationer's intensive probation supervision or supervised probation back to the county in which the probationer's probation was originally imposed except for revocation hearings or an order of the court. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 13-903, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-903. Calculation of periods of probation A. A period of probation commences on the day it is imposed or as designated by the court, and an extended period of probation commences on the day the original period lapses. B. If a court determines that the defendant violated a condition of the defendant's probation but reinstates probation, the period between the date of the violation and the date of restoration of probation is not computed as part of the period of probation. If it is determined that the defendant is not a violator, there is no interruption of the period of probation. C. The running of the period of probation shall cease during the unauthorized absence of the defendant from the jurisdiction or from any required supervision and shall resume only upon on the defendant's voluntary or involuntary return to the probation service. D. The running of the period of probation shall cease during the period from the filing of the petition to revoke probation to the termination of revocation of probation proceedings, except that if a court determines that the defendant is not a violator, there is no interruption of the period of probation. E. If probation is imposed on one who at the time is serving a sentence of imprisonment imposed on a different conviction, service of the sentence of imprisonment shall not satisfy the probation. F. Time spent in custody under section 13-901, subsection F  H shall be credited to any sentence of imprisonment imposed upon on revocation of probation. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 13-917, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-917. Modification of supervision A. The adult probation officer shall periodically examine the risk and needs of each person granted intensive probation and the risks of modifying the level of supervision of the person. The court or the adult probation officer may at any time modify the level of intensive probation supervision of a person granted intensive probation. The court may transfer the person to standard probation or terminate the period of intensive probation pursuant to section 13-901, subsection E  G. B. If a petition to revoke the grant of intensive probation is filed and the court finds that the person has committed an additional felony offense that posed a serious threat or danger to the community, the court shall revoke the grant of intensive probation and impose a term of imprisonment as authorized by law. If the court finds that the person has committed a violation of a condition of intensive probation that posed a serious threat or danger to the community, the court shall revoke the grant of intensive probation and impose a term of imprisonment as authorized by law.  If the court finds that the person has violated any other condition of intensive probation, the court may modify the conditions of intensive probation or may revoke the grant of intensive probation and impose a term of imprisonment as authorized by law. C. The court shall notify the parties, and the victim on request, of any proposed modification of the terms of a person's intensive probation if that modification will substantially affect the person's contact with or safety of the victim or if the modification involves restitution or incarceration status. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 13-924, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-924. Probation; earned time credit; work time credit; applicability; definitions A. The court may adjust the period of a probationer's supervised probation on the recommendation of an adult probation officer for earned time credit or work time credit. B. Earned time credit equals twenty days for every thirty days that a probationer does all of the following: 1. Exhibits positive progression toward the goals and treatment of the probationers case plan. 2. Is current on payments for court ordered court-ordered restitution and is in compliance with all other nonmonetary obligations. 3. Is current in completing community restitution. C. Work time credit equals thirty days for every thirty days that a probationer does all of the following: 1. Is engaged in eligible employment. A probationer must provide supporting documentation to the supervising probation officer within five business days after completing thirty days of eligible employment. The supervising probation officer must verify the probationer's employment through the supporting documentation that is provided by the probationer and by any other means that the court determines is necessary to verify the work, including site visits and telephonic verification. The probation officer must document any request for work time credit that is denied. 2. Exhibits positive progression toward the goals and treatment of the probationer's case plan. 3. Is current on payments for court-ordered restitution and is in compliance with all other nonmonetary obligations. 4. Is current in completing community restitution. D. Any earned time credit and work time credit awarded pursuant to this section shall be revoked if a probationer is found in violation of a condition of probation. E. This section does not apply to a probationer who is currently: 1. On lifetime probation. 2. On probation for any class 2 or 3 felony. 3. On probation exclusively for a misdemeanor offense. 4. Required to register pursuant to section 13-3821. F. This section has no effect on the ability of the court to terminate the period of probation or intensive probation pursuant to section 13-901, subsection E  G at a time earlier than originally imposed. G. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Eligible employment" means any occupation or combination of occupations for which a person can provide supporting documentation verifying at least one hundred thirty wage-earning hours in any thirty-day period. 2. "Supporting documentation" means an employment record, pay stub, employment letter, contract or other reliable means of verifying employment. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.